Oklahoma, session 2025, SB435.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:

SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified

in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3-111 of Title 47, unless there

is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

A. Any directive or instruction regarding policy and rules that

is to be given by an employee of Service Oklahoma to another

employee of Service Oklahoma shall be in writing and shall clearly

state who is providing the directive or instruction. Any employee

who gives a directive or instruction that violates state statute or

legislative intent shall be suspended for thirty (30) days without

pay.





Req. No. 813 Page 1

B. For the purposes of this section “employee of Service

Oklahoma” shall mean any individual currently employed by Service

Oklahoma, including the Executive Director.

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.



60-1-813 MSBB 1/14/2025 3:51:24 PM





































Req. No. 813 Page 2